Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 11.1 Athletic Coaches

16-11.1-1.
Athletic coaches — First aid course required.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning the necessary requirements for first aid certification for any person who coaches in any athletic program in any school supported wholly or in part by public money.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 208, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 20, § 15.

16-11.1-2.
Duties of coach — Preseason lecture.

Prior to the start of each sport’s season, the head coach of a team which regularly competes against a school which receives public funds shall give or sponsor a lecture to his or her team as regards the long-term health effects of substance abuse, including, but not limited to, the use of steroids, alcohol, and drugs. The head coach shall utilize community resources including drug counselors and the student assistance program when giving or sponsoring the lecture.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 376, § 1.